Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-390
Streets; improvements; petition of property owners.

Except as otherwise specifically provided in sections 14-384 to 14-3,127, any city shall not order or cause to be made any of the improvements provided in such sections in any improvement district except upon a petition of the record owners of the majority of the frontage of taxable property in the district abutting upon the streets or parts of streets proposed to be improved.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 7, p. 198;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 96.
July 21, 2022